Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 53 Distribution And Discharge
28-53-118. Discharge of personal representative.

Upon the filing of evidence satisfactory to the court that distribution has been made as directed in the order of final distribution, the court shall enter an order discharging the personal representative and his or her surety from further liability or accountability with respect to the administration.

Evidence satisfactory to the court may consist of:

Receipts, unless other written evidence of distribution exists, such as cancelled checks; or

In the case of property under title, a copy of the document transferring title to the distributee.

The order, or an order of discharge entered under § 28-53-104, shall be final, except that upon a petition's being filed within three (3) years of the entry thereof, the order may be set aside for fraud in the settlement of the account of the personal representative.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey of Arkansas Law: Decedents' Estates, 6 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 139.

Even though a probate court had entered an order closing the estate of a guardian and discharging the executor, a ward's appeal was not subject to dismissal as moot. Shinley v. Ricks, 234 Ark. 767, 354 S.W.2d 547 (1962).

The adjudication of a probate court in the final settlement of an administrator's accounts as to amount of his liability was conclusive evidence against his sureties in an action on the bond. George v. Elms, 46 Ark. 260 (1885) (decision under prior law).

In an action to have an estate recovered and partitioned for benefit of a widow and child where sister of the deceased, who had herself appointed the personal representative of the deceased's estate, failed to notify deceased's wife and adopted daughter, who resided in a foreign country, of deceased's death, or of her appointment, failed to list the wife and daughter as heirs on her petition for letters of administration, and failed to notify them when the estate was closed, the sister breached her duty of trust and was guilty of fraud, and the statute of limitations did not commence to run until the wife was put on notice of her husband's death. Walters v. Lewis, 276 Ark. 286, 634 S.W.2d 129 (1982).

Cited: Montgomery v. First Nat'l Bank, 242 Ark. 329, 414 S.W.2d 109 (1967).

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Section 28-50-101(f) does not repeal this section by implication. Callaghan v. Coberly, 927 F. Supp. 332 (W.D. Ark. 1996).

This section, concerning reopening administration of an estate, did not apply where the estate had been dismissed for failure of the executrix to administer the estate, it was not settled, and the personal representative had not been discharged.Dawson v. Dawson, 2017 Ark. App. 584 (2017).

Where legatees' petition to reopen administration alleged that the administrator was not legally appointed, that she did not qualify for letters testamentary, although the will was admitted to probate, that they received no notice of the filing of accounting, or hearing thereon, and that the administrator, who claimed all of the proceeds of the estate, had a personal interest which conflicted with her official duties, such facts were sufficient to require the taking of proof. Holt v. Moody, 234 Ark. 245, 352 S.W.2d 87 (1961).

Circuit court improperly granted niece's petition to reopen probate of her aunt's estate under as she failed to file the petition within the 90-day limitation period set forth in Ark. R. Civ. P. 60(a) or provide “other cause,” such as fraud or lack of notice. Bullock v. Barnes, 366 Ark. 444, 236 S.W.3d 498 (2006).

Probate court did not err in reopening a decedent's estate in order to reform the probate file and a deed to show that real property was conveyed to purchasers with a reservation of one-half the mineral rights on each tract of land because the president of the bank that administered the estate testified that one-half of the mineral rights were not to be sold to purchasers, and his testimony was supported by the notice of sale, the installment note signed by the purchasers, the certificate of purchase, and two deeds, one reserving one-half the mineral rights in each tract and the other conveying one-half the mineral rights to a church; §28-1-115 was inapplicable and did not limit this section because §28-1-115 did not speak to reopening the estate, which was authorized by this section.Moore v. First Presbyterian Church of Searcy, Ark., Inc., 2010 Ark. App. 269 (2010).

Ark. R. Civ. P. 60 does not limit the probate court's authority to reopen the estate under this section because this section authorizes the reopening of an estate on the grounds allowed in the statute, separate and apart from the grounds for reopening a case provided under Rule 60.Moore v. First Presbyterian Church of Searcy, Ark., Inc., 2010 Ark. App. 269 (2010).

That an amended petition to have a special administrator appointed and the related amended order were not filed under the original probate case docket number was not an outcome-determinative point when deciding whether the original probate case was reopened. Both the original case and the petition to reopen the case were filed in the same division—the probate division of the Garland County Circuit Court, and court clerks, not the parties, assign case numbers.Arman v. Chi St. Vincent Hot Springs, 2019 Ark. App. 187, 574 S.W.3d 731 (2019).

A probate court has the authority to reopen the administration of an estate for the purpose of determining the proper distribution of personal property alleged to have been omitted from the settlement. Wilson v. Davis, 239 Ark. 305, 389 S.W.2d 442 (1965).

Where a son who exercised an option to purchase a decedent's real property paid less than the amount required by the decedent's will, the estate was properly reopened pursuant to subsection (a) of this section for the limited purpose of allowing the personal representative to collect the deficiency from the son, as opposed to permitting rescission of the deed, because the personal representative had an adequate remedy at law and the amount of damages was readily ascertainable.Moreland v. Lonzell Dodds, 2012 Ark. App. 10, 388 S.W.3d 73 (2012).

Probate division of the circuit court had the authority under this section to appoint a special administrator for the limited purpose of pursuing unliquidated tort claims that were not addressed before the estate of the special administrator's parent was closed. Although the circuit court did not use the word “reopen” in its order, its intent was clear enough because it found that the decedent's estate was opened and closed without resolving wrongful death or survival claims and that a special administrator was necessary to pursue the claims.Arman v. Chi St. Vincent Hot Springs, 2019 Ark. App. 187, 574 S.W.3d 731 (2019).

Special administrator of a reopened probate case could file survival claims because the claims belonged to the decedent's estate and had to be filed by the personal representative of the estate or a special administrator. The trustee that had served as the estate's personal representative did not have to file the claims.Arman v. Chi St. Vincent Hot Springs, 2019 Ark. App. 187, 574 S.W.3d 731 (2019).

A claimant having a personal injury claim resulting from an accident involving an automobile driven by a decedent had no standing to petition for a reopening of the decedent's estate after its administration had been completed, the executor discharged, and there had been no attempt to assert a claim which was barred by statute. Doepke v. Smith, 248 Ark. 511, 452 S.W.2d 627 (1970).

An estate may not be reopened upon the petition of one claiming damages for the alleged negligence of the decedent who alleges that he was induced to delay filing a claim against the estate within the statutory period by the fraudulent representations of decedent's liability insurance carrier that it would settle his claim as soon as his injuries could be evaluated. Doepke v. Smith, 248 Ark. 511, 452 S.W.2d 627 (1970).

Cited: White v. Welsh, 323 Ark. 479, 915 S.W.2d 274 (1996); Skaggs v. Cullipher, 57 Ark. App. 50, 941 S.W.2d 443 (1997); Tatro v. Langston, 328 Ark. 548, 944 S.W.2d 118 (Ark. 1997).

Effective Dates. Acts 1967, No. 209, § 7: Mar. 6, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that many residents of this State have executed wills in good faith believing them to qualify for the marital deduction for Federal Estate Tax purposes, but which may not so qualify or may be deemed not to so qualify (particularly by virtue of Revenue Procedure 64-19 issued by the Internal Revenue Service), at great financial hazard and loss to their spouses and estates, and causing confusion and expense in the administration of estates and that the enactment of this act will result in curing such disqualifications in many cases. Therefore, an emergency is hereby deemed to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 643, § 5: Apr. 4, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Arkansas General Assembly that existing statutes concerning transfers of assets from decedents' estates at values referencing federal estate tax values may not be sufficient to preserve the estate tax marital deduction under potential challenges by the Internal Revenue Service where the nonmarital share of the estate is transferred to a pecuniary credit shelter trust and the marital share for the benefit of the surviving spouse consists of the residue of the estate (or trust) assets. If the Internal Revenue Service successfully adhered to such a position, the resulting loss of the marital deduction would bring about substantial estate tax costs, thereby placing an undue burden upon the families of decedents owning farms and family businesses. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Ark. L. Rev.

Act 209 of 1967 — An Act to Obtain the Marital Deduction in Wills or Trusts that Do Not Otherwise Qualify, 22 Ark. L. Rev. 800.

Note, Hanna v. Hanna: Marital Bequest Interpretation — True Pecuniary or Minimum Worth Provision?, 36 Ark. L. Rev. 413.

Note, Estate of Shelfer v. Commissioner of Internal Revenue: Is the Tax Court's Position on QTIPs “Stub”born or Justified?, 48 Ark. L. Rev. 987.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 171; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2912; Acts 1999, No. 122, § 1.

28-53-119. Reopening administration.

(1)If, after an estate has been settled and the personal representative discharged, other property of the estate is discovered, or if it appears that any necessary act remains unperformed on the part of the personal representative, or for any other proper cause, the court, upon the petition of any person interested in the estate and without notice or upon such notice as it may direct, may order that the estate be reopened.

It may reappoint the personal representative or appoint another personal representative to administer such property or perform such act as may be deemed necessary.

Unless the court shall otherwise order, the provisions of the Probate Code as to an original administration shall apply to the proceedings had in the reopened administration so far as may be appropriate. However, no claim which is already barred can be asserted in the reopened administration.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 172; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2913.

Subchapter 2

— Transfers to Surviving Spouses

28-53-201. Prior law and distributions unaffected.

This subchapter shall not be deemed to create any implication of change in existing law or invalidate any distribution in kind made prior to March 6, 1967, with respect to which values other than those specified in this subchapter were used.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 209, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2909.4.

28-53-202. Applicability of subchapter.

This subchapter shall be effective with respect to all wills and revocable inter vivos trusts executed or created before or after March 6, 1967, by persons dying on or after March 6, 1967, and to irrevocable inter vivos trusts created on or after March 6, 1967.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 209, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2909.5.

28-53-203. Allocation of assets with value equivalent to federal estate tax value.

Whenever under any last will and testament or trust instrument of a decedent who is survived by a spouse, the executor, trustee, or other fiduciary is authorized to or required by the terms of such an instrument to satisfy a pecuniary bequest, including a pecuniary bequest in trust or transfer in trust of a pecuniary amount to or for the benefit of any beneficiary, by transferring or allocating assets in kind at their federal estate tax values or at any value other than the fair market value of the assets at the date of their distribution or allocation, then the fiduciary shall satisfy the pecuniary bequest or transfer in trust by the distribution or allocation of assets, including cash, having an aggregate fair market value on the date or dates of distribution or allocation equal to the amount of the pecuniary bequest or transfer in trust as finally determined for federal estate tax purposes, unless the will or governing instrument provides otherwise.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 209, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2909.1; Acts 1987, No. 643, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1987, No. 643, § 3, provided that the act shall be effective with respect to all wills and revocable inter-vivos trusts executed or created before or after April 4, 1987, by persons dying on or after January 1, 1987, and to irrevocable inter-vivos trusts created on or after April 4, 1987.

28-53-204. Assets distributed to be representative of appreciation or depreciation of all assets.

A provision in a last will and testament or trust instrument that an executor or fiduciary authorized or required by its terms to satisfy a pecuniary bequest or transfer in trust with assets in kind at their federal estate tax values or at any values other than fair market values at date of distribution or allocation shall act fairly or equitably or not arbitrarily in satisfying the bequest or transfer, shall be deemed, in the absence of clear provisions to the contrary, to be a direction to distribute or allocate assets, including cash, fairly representative, on the date of distribution or allocation, of the appreciation or depreciation in the value of all property available for distribution or allocation.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 209, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2909.2.

28-53-205. Alternative valuations.

Whenever there is a provision in the will or governing instrument that an executor or fiduciary who is authorized or required by its terms to satisfy a pecuniary bequest or transfer in trust, with assets in kind at their federal estate tax values or at any value other than fair market values at date or dates of distribution or allocation, is authorized or required, in satisfying the bequest or transfer, to either:

Distribute or allocate assets, including cash, having an aggregate fair market value on the date or dates of distribution or allocation equal to or at least equal to the amount of the pecuniary bequest or transfer in trust as finally determined for federal estate tax purposes; or

Distribute or allocate assets, including cash, fairly representative, on the date or dates of distribution or allocation, of the appreciation or depreciation in the value of all properties available for distribution or allocation.

The executor or fiduciary, nevertheless, must distribute or allocate assets, including cash, having an aggregate fair market value on the date or dates of distribution or allocation equal to the amount of the pecuniary bequest or transfer in trust as finally determined for federal estate tax purposes.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1987, No. 643, § 3, provided that the act shall be effective with respect to all wills and revocable inter-vivos trusts executed or created before or after April 4, 1987, by persons dying on or after January 1, 1987, and to irrevocable inter-vivos trusts created on or after April 4, 1987.

Ark. L. Rev.

Haught, 1988 Update to the Arkansas Probate System: An Overview of Recent Developments in Arkansas Probate Practice, 42 Ark. L. Rev. 631.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 209, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2909.3; Acts 1987, No. 643, § 2.